Utah statutes.
36-16a-106.   Procedures for submission of opinion questions to popular vote.

(1)  The lieutenant governor, the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, and each election official shall comply with the procedures contained in this section whenever the Legislature authorizes an opinion question under Section 36-16a-102.

(2)  No later than July 20 before the election, the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall:

(a)  draft and designate a ballot title that summarizes the subject matter of the opinion question; and

(b)  deliver the materials created under Subsection (2)(a) to the lieutenant governor.

(3)  No later than August 31 before the election, the lieutenant governor shall certify the number and ballot title of the opinion question to each election official as provided in Section 20A-6-107.

(4)  No more than 60 days nor less than 14 days before the date of the election, the lieutenant governor shall cause the full text of the opinion question to be published in at least one newspaper in every county of the state where a newspaper is published.

(5)  Each election official shall cause both the number and title of the opinion question to be:

(a)  printed on the ballot to be used on election day;

(b)  printed on the sample ballots; and

(c)  otherwise published as provided by law.

